Tennessee, session 114, SB0004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 16-3-103, is amended by adding the
following language to the end of the section:
Such expenses shall include each year an amount sufficient to provide the chief justice
with a security detail to transport and accompany the chief justice on all official state
business.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0004
000118
- 1 -